test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kissa_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - riddo: #KISSA
    riddo+N+Sg+Nom:  riddo
    riddo+N+Sg+Gen:  riˊdo
    riddo+N+Sg+Acc:  riˊdo
    riddo+N+Sg+Ill:  riidon
    riddo+N+Sg+Loc:  riddoost
    riddo+N+Sg+Com:  riddoin
    riddo+N+Sg+Abe:  riˊdottáá
    riddo+N+Ess:  riddon
    riddo+N+Par:  riddod
    riddo+N+Pl+Nom:  riˊdoh
    riddo+N+Pl+Gen:  riˊdoi
    riddo+N+Pl+Acc:  riddoid
    riddo+N+Pl+Ill:  riddoid
    riddo+N+Pl+Loc:  riˊdoin
    riddo+N+Pl+Com:  riˊdoiguin
    riddo+N+Pl+Abe:  riˊdoittáá

  Noun - šiljo: #KISSA
    šiljo+N+Sg+Nom:  šiljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Gen:  šiˊljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Acc:  šiˊljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Ill:  šiiljon
    šiljo+N+Sg+Loc:  šiljoost
    šiljo+N+Sg+Com:  šiljoin
    šiljo+N+Sg+Abe:  šiˊljottáá
    šiljo+N+Ess:  šiljon
    šiljo+N+Par:  šiljod
    šiljo+N+Pl+Nom:  šiˊljoh
    šiljo+N+Pl+Gen:  šiˊljoi
    šiljo+N+Pl+Acc:  šiljoid
    šiljo+N+Pl+Ill:  šiljoid
    šiljo+N+Pl+Loc:  šiˊljoin
    šiljo+N+Pl+Com:  šiˊljoiguin
    šiljo+N+Pl+Abe:  šiˊljoittáá

  Noun - vihko: #KISSA
    vihko+N+Sg+Nom:  vihko
    vihko+N+Sg+Gen:  viˊhko
    vihko+N+Sg+Acc:  viˊhko
    vihko+N+Sg+Ill:  viihkon
    vihko+N+Sg+Loc:  vihkoost
    vihko+N+Sg+Com:  vihkoin
    vihko+N+Sg+Abe:  viˊhkottáá
    vihko+N+Ess:  vihkon
    vihko+N+Par:  vihkod
    vihko+N+Pl+Nom:  viˊhkoh
    vihko+N+Pl+Gen:  viˊhkoi
    vihko+N+Pl+Acc:  vihkoid
    vihko+N+Pl+Ill:  vihkoid
    vihko+N+Pl+Loc:  viˊhkoin
    vihko+N+Pl+Com:  viˊhkoiguin
    vihko+N+Pl+Abe:  viˊhkoittáá

  Noun - tinno: #KISSA
    tinno+N+Sg+Nom:  tinno
    tinno+N+Sg+Gen:  tiˊṇo
    tinno+N+Sg+Acc:  tiˊṇo
    tinno+N+Sg+Ill:  tiiṇon
    tinno+N+Sg+Loc:  tinnoost
    tinno+N+Sg+Com:  tinnoin
    tinno+N+Sg+Abe:  tiˊṇottáá
    tinno+N+Ess:  tinnon
    tinno+N+Par:  tinnod
    tinno+N+Pl+Nom:  tiˊṇoh
    tinno+N+Pl+Gen:  tiˊṇoi
    tinno+N+Pl+Acc:  tinnoid
    tinno+N+Pl+Ill:  tinnoid
    tinno+N+Pl+Loc:  tiˊṇoin
    tinno+N+Pl+Com:  tiˊṇoiguin
    tinno+N+Pl+Abe:  tiˊṇoittáá

  Noun - kirno: #KISSA
    kirno+N+Sg+Nom:  kirno
    kirno+N+Sg+Gen:  kiˊrno
    kirno+N+Sg+Acc:  kiˊrno
    kirno+N+Sg+Ill:  kiirnon
    kirno+N+Sg+Loc:  kirnoost
    kirno+N+Sg+Com:  kirnoin
    kirno+N+Sg+Abe:  kiˊrnottáá
    kirno+N+Ess:     kirnon
    kirno+N+Par:     kirnod
    kirno+N+Pl+Nom:  kiˊrnoh
    kirno+N+Pl+Gen:  kiˊrnoi
    kirno+N+Pl+Acc:  kirnoid
    kirno+N+Pl+Ill:  kirnoid
    kirno+N+Pl+Loc:  kiˊrnoin
    kirno+N+Pl+Com:  kiˊrnoiguin
    kirno+N+Pl+Abe:  kiˊrnoittáá

  Noun - lippo: #KISSA
    lippo+N+Sg+Nom:  lippo
    lippo+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊpo
    lippo+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊpo
    lippo+N+Sg+Ill:  liipon
    lippo+N+Sg+Loc:  lippoost
    lippo+N+Sg+Com:  lippoin
    lippo+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊpottáá
    lippo+N+Ess:  lippon
    lippo+N+Par:  lippod
    lippo+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊpoh
    lippo+N+Pl+Gen:  liˊpoi
    lippo+N+Pl+Acc:  lippoid
    lippo+N+Pl+Ill:  lippoid
    lippo+N+Pl+Loc:  liˊpoin
    lippo+N+Pl+Com:  liˊpoiguin
    lippo+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊpoittáá

  Noun - rippo: #KISSA
    rippo+N+Sg+Nom:  rippo
    rippo+N+Sg+Gen:  riˊpo
    rippo+N+Sg+Acc:  riˊpo
    rippo+N+Sg+Ill:  riipon
    rippo+N+Sg+Loc:  rippoost
    rippo+N+Sg+Com:  rippoin
    rippo+N+Sg+Abe:  riˊpottáá
    rippo+N+Ess:  rippon
    rippo+N+Par:  rippod
    rippo+N+Pl+Nom:  riˊpoh
    rippo+N+Pl+Gen:  riˊpoi
    rippo+N+Pl+Acc:  rippoid
    rippo+N+Pl+Ill:  rippoid
    rippo+N+Pl+Loc:  riˊpoin
    rippo+N+Pl+Com:  riˊpoiguin
    rippo+N+Pl+Abe:  riˊpoittáá

  Noun - nitro: #KISSA
    nitro+N+Sg+Nom:  nitro
    nitro+N+Sg+Gen:  niˊtro
    nitro+N+Sg+Acc:  niˊtro
    nitro+N+Sg+Ill:  niitron
    nitro+N+Sg+Loc:  nitroost
    nitro+N+Sg+Com:  nitroin
    nitro+N+Sg+Abe:  niˊtrottáá
    nitro+N+Ess:  nitron
    nitro+N+Par:  nitrod
    nitro+N+Pl+Nom:  niˊtroh
    nitro+N+Pl+Gen:  niˊtroi
    nitro+N+Pl+Acc:  nitroid
    nitro+N+Pl+Ill:  nitroid
    nitro+N+Pl+Loc:  niˊtroin
    nitro+N+Pl+Com:  niˊtroiguin
    nitro+N+Pl+Abe:  niˊtroittáá

  Noun - pisso: #KISSA
    pisso+N+Sg+Nom:  pisso
    pisso+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊṣo
    pisso+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊṣo
    pisso+N+Sg+Ill:  piiṣon
    pisso+N+Sg+Loc:  pissoost
    pisso+N+Sg+Com:  pissoin
    pisso+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊṣottáá
    pisso+N+Ess:  pisson
    pisso+N+Par:  pissod
    pisso+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊṣoh
    pisso+N+Pl+Gen:  piˊṣoi
    pisso+N+Pl+Acc: pissoid
    pisso+N+Pl+Ill:  pissoid
    pisso+N+Pl+Loc:  piˊṣoin
    pisso+N+Pl+Com:  piˊṣoiguin
    pisso+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊṣoittáá

  Noun - kisto: #KISSA
    kisto+N+Sg+Nom:  kisto
    kisto+N+Sg+Gen:  kiˊsto
    kisto+N+Sg+Acc:  kiˊsto
    kisto+N+Sg+Ill:  kiiston
    kisto+N+Sg+Loc:  kistoost
    kisto+N+Sg+Com:  kistoin
    kisto+N+Sg+Abe:  kiˊstottáá
    kisto+N+Ess:  kiston
    kisto+N+Par:  kistod
    kisto+N+Pl+Nom:  kiˊstoh
    kisto+N+Pl+Gen:  kiˊstoi
    kisto+N+Pl+Acc:  kistoid
    kisto+N+Pl+Ill:  kistoid
    kisto+N+Pl+Loc:  kiˊstoin
    kisto+N+Pl+Com:  kiˊstoiguin
    kisto+N+Pl+Abe:  kiˊstoittáá

  Noun - listo: #KISSA
    listo+N+Sg+Nom:  listo
    listo+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊsto
    listo+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊsto
    listo+N+Sg+Ill:  liiston
    listo+N+Sg+Loc:  listoost
    listo+N+Sg+Com:  listoin
    listo+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊstottáá
    listo+N+Ess:  liston
    listo+N+Par:  listod
    listo+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊstoh
    listo+N+Pl+Gen:  liˊstoi
    listo+N+Pl+Acc:  listoid
    listo+N+Pl+Ill:  listoid
    listo+N+Pl+Loc:  liˊstoin
    listo+N+Pl+Com:  liˊstoiguin
    listo+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊstoittáá

  Noun - litto: #KISSA
    litto+N+Sg+Nom:  litto
    litto+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊto
    litto+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊto
    litto+N+Sg+Ill:  liiton
    litto+N+Sg+Loc:  littoost
    litto+N+Sg+Com:  littoin
    litto+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊtottáá
    litto+N+Ess:  litton
    litto+N+Par:  littod
    litto+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊtoh
    litto+N+Pl+Gen:  liˊtoi
    litto+N+Pl+Acc:  littoid
    litto+N+Pl+Ill:  littoid
    litto+N+Pl+Loc:  liˊtoin
    litto+N+Pl+Com:  liˊtoiguin
    litto+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊtoittáá

  Noun - mitto: #KISSA
    mitto+N+Sg+Nom:  mitto
    mitto+N+Sg+Gen:  miˊto
    mitto+N+Sg+Acc:  miˊto
    mitto+N+Sg+Ill:  miiton
    mitto+N+Sg+Loc:  mittoost
    mitto+N+Sg+Com:  mittoin
    mitto+N+Sg+Abe:  miˊtottáá
    mitto+N+Ess:  mitton
    mitto+N+Par:  mittod
    mitto+N+Pl+Nom:  miˊtoh
    mitto+N+Pl+Gen:  miˊtoi
    mitto+N+Pl+Acc:  mittoid
    mitto+N+Pl+Ill:  mittoid
    mitto+N+Pl+Loc:  miˊtoin
    mitto+N+Pl+Com:  miˊtoiguin
    mitto+N+Pl+Abe:  miˊtoittáá

  Noun - tipšo: #KISSA
    tipšo+N+Sg+Nom:  tipšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Gen:  tiˊpšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Acc:  tiˊpšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Ill:  tiipšon
    tipšo+N+Sg+Loc:  tipšoost
    tipšo+N+Sg+Com:  tipšoin
    tipšo+N+Sg+Abe:  tiˊpšottáá
    tipšo+N+Ess:  tipšon
    tipšo+N+Par:  tipšod
    tipšo+N+Pl+Nom:  tiˊpšoh
    tipšo+N+Pl+Gen:  tiˊpšoi
    tipšo+N+Pl+Acc:  tipšoid
    tipšo+N+Pl+Ill:  tipšoid
    tipšo+N+Pl+Loc:  tiˊpšoin
    tipšo+N+Pl+Com:  tiˊpšoiguin
    tipšo+N+Pl+Abe:  tiˊpšoittáá
  
  Noun - cirrá:
    cirrá+N+Sg+Nom:  cirrá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Gen:  ciˊṛá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Acc:  ciˊṛá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Ill:  ciiṛán
    cirrá+N+Sg+Loc:  cirráást
    cirrá+N+Sg+Com:  cirráin
    cirrá+N+Sg+Abe:  ciˊṛáttáá
    cirrá+N+Ess:  cirrán
    cirrá+N+Par:  cirrád
    cirrá+N+Pl+Nom:  ciˊṛáh
    cirrá+N+Pl+Gen:  ciˊṛái
    cirrá+N+Pl+Acc:  cirráid
    cirrá+N+Pl+Ill:  cirráid
    cirrá+N+Pl+Loc:  cirráin
    cirrá+N+Pl+Com:  ciˊṛáiguin
    cirrá+N+Pl+Abe:  ciˊṛáittáá

  Noun - kissá:
    kissá+N+Sg+Nom:  kissá
    kissá+N+Sg+Gen:  kiˊṣá
    kissá+N+Sg+Acc:  kiˊṣá
    kissá+N+Sg+Ill:  kiiṣán
    kissá+N+Sg+Loc:  kissáást
    kissá+N+Sg+Com:  kissáin
    kissá+N+Sg+Abe:  kiˊṣáttáá
    kissá+N+Ess:  kissán
    kissá+N+Par:  kissád
    kissá+N+Pl+Nom:  kiˊṣáh
    kissá+N+Pl+Gen:  kiˊṣái
    kissá+N+Pl+Acc:  kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Ill:  kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Loc:  kiˊṣáin
    kissá+N+Pl+Com:  kiˊṣáiguin
    kissá+N+Pl+Abe:  kiˊṣáittáá

  Noun - kassa: # - ok
    kassa+N+Sg+Nom:  kassa
    kassa+N+Sg+Gen:  kaˊṣa
    kassa+N+Sg+Ill:  kaaṣan
    kassa+N+Sg+Loc:  kassaast
    kassa+N+Sg+Com:  kassain
    kassa+N+Sg+Abe:  kaˊṣattáá
    kassa+N+Ess:  kassan
    kassa+N+Par:  kassad
    kassa+N+Pl+Nom:  kaˊṣah
    kassa+N+Pl+Gen:  kaˊṣai
    kassa+N+Pl+Acc:  kassaid
    kassa+N+Pl+Ill:  kassaid
    kassa+N+Pl+Loc:  kassain
    kassa+N+Pl+Com:  kaˊṣaiguin
    kassa+N+Pl+Abe:  kaˊṣaittáá

  Noun - pittá:
    pittá+N+Sg+Nom:  pittá
    pittá+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊtá
    pittá+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊtá
    pittá+N+Sg+Ill:  piitán
    pittá+N+Sg+Loc:  pittáást
    pittá+N+Sg+Com:  pittáin
    pittá+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊtáttáá
    pittá+N+Ess:  pittán
    pittá+N+Par: pittád
    pittá+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊtáh
    pittá+N+Pl+Gen:  piˊtái
    pittá+N+Pl+Acc:  pittáid
    pittá+N+Pl+Ill:  pittáid
    pittá+N+Pl+Loc:  piˊtáin
    pittá+N+Pl+Com:  piˊtáiguin
    pittá+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊtáittáá

  Noun - hellá: # - ok
    hellá+N+Sg+Nom:  hellá
    hellá+N+Sg+Gen:  heˊḷá
    hellá+N+Sg+Acc:  heˊḷá
    hellá+N+Sg+Ill:  heeḷán
    hellá+N+Sg+Loc:  helláást
    hellá+N+Sg+Com:  helláin
    hellá+N+Sg+Abe:  heˊḷáttáá
    hellá+N+Ess:  hellán
    hellá+N+Par:  hellád
    hellá+N+Pl+Nom:  heˊḷáh
    hellá+N+Pl+Gen:  heˊḷái
    hellá+N+Pl+Acc:  helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Ill:  helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Loc:  heˊḷáin
    hellá+N+Pl+Com:  heˊḷáiguin
    hellá+N+Pl+Abe:  heˊḷáittáá

  Noun - pyerá:
    pyerá+N+Sg+Nom:  pyerá # lovnâsääni, ij oro nuávditmin uánánemnjuolgâdusâid
    pyerá+N+Sg+Gen:  pyerá
    pyerá+N+Sg+Acc:  pyerá
    pyerá+N+Sg+Ill:  pyerán
    pyerá+N+Sg+Loc: [pyerást, pyeráást]
    pyerá+N+Sg+Com:  pyeráin
    pyerá+N+Sg+Abe:  pyeˊráttáá
    pyerá+N+Ess:  pyerán
    pyerá+N+Par:  pyerád
    pyerá+N+Pl+Nom:  pyeráh
    pyerá+N+Pl+Gen:  pyerái
    pyerá+N+Pl+Acc:  pyeráid
    pyerá+N+Pl+Ill:  pyeráid
    pyerá+N+Pl+Loc:  pyeráin
    pyerá+N+Pl+Com:  pyeˊráiguin
    pyerá+N+Pl+Abe:  pyeˊráittáá

  Noun - pálstá:
    pálstá+N+Sg+Nom:  pálstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Gen:  páˊlstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Acc: páˊlstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Ill:  páálstán
    pálstá+N+Sg+Loc:  pálstáást
    pálstá+N+Sg+Com:  pálstáin
    pálstá+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊlstáttáá
    pálstá+N+Ess:  pálstán
    pálstá+N+Par: pálstád
    pálstá+N+Pl+Nom:  páˊlstáh
    pálstá+N+Pl+Gen:  páˊlstái
    pálstá+N+Pl+Acc:  pálstáid
    pálstá+N+Pl+Ill:  pálstáid
    pálstá+N+Pl+Loc:  páˊlstáin
    pálstá+N+Pl+Com:  páˊlstáiguin
    pálstá+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊlstáittáá

  Noun - liljá:
    liljá+N+Sg+Nom:  liljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Ill:  liilján
    liljá+N+Sg+Loc:  liljáást
    liljá+N+Sg+Com:  liljáin
    liljá+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊljáttáá
    liljá+N+Ess:  lilján
    liljá+N+Par: liljád
    liljá+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊljáh
    liljá+N+Pl+Gen:  [liiljái, liˊljái]
    liljá+N+Pl+Acc: liiljáid
    liljá+N+Pl+Ill:  liljáid
    liljá+N+Pl+Loc: [liiljáin, liˊljáin]
    liljá+N+Pl+Com:  liˊljáiguin
    liljá+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊljáittáá

  Noun - tiljá:
    tiljá+N+Sg+Nom:  tiljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Gen:  tiˊljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Acc:  tiˊljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Ill:  tiilján
    tiljá+N+Sg+Loc:  tiljáást
    tiljá+N+Sg+Com:  tiljáin
    tiljá+N+Sg+Abe:  tiˊljáttáá
    tiljá+N+Ess:  tilján
    tiljá+N+Par:  tiljád
    tiljá+N+Pl+Nom:  tiˊljáh
    tiljá+N+Pl+Gen:  tiˊljái
    tiljá+N+Pl+Acc:  tiljáid
    tiljá+N+Pl+Ill:  tiljáid
    tiljá+N+Pl+Loc:  tiljáin
    tiljá+N+Pl+Com:  tiˊljáiguin
    tiljá+N+Pl+Abe:  tiˊljáittáá

  Noun - linjá:
    linjá+N+Sg+Nom:  linjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊnjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊnjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Ill:  liinján
    linjá+N+Sg+Loc:  linjáást
    linjá+N+Sg+Com:  linjáin
    linjá+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊnjáttáá
    linjá+N+Ess:  linján
    linjá+N+Par:  linjád
    linjá+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊnjáh
    linjá+N+Pl+Gen:  [liinjái, liˊnjái]
    linjá+N+Pl+Acc:  linjáid
    linjá+N+Pl+Ill:  linjáid
    linjá+N+Pl+Loc:  liˊnjáin
    linjá+N+Pl+Com:  liˊnjáiguin
    linjá+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊnjáittáá
